Kentucky statutes. TITLE XL Crimes and Punishments
Penalties

439.990.
Penalties.

Any warden or other officer of any prison or any peace officer who willfully fails or refuses to execute or obey the orders of the department, one (1) of its divisions, or the board, under any provision of KRS

439.250

to

439.560

, shall be fined not less than twenty-five dollars ($25) nor more than two hundred dollars ($200).

Any Commonwealth’s attorney who willfully violates KRS

439.370

shall be fined one hundred dollars ($100).

Any person who willfully violates any of the provisions of KRS

439.500

or

439.510

shall be guilty of a misdemeanor, and upon conviction thereof shall be punished by a fine not exceeding five hundred dollars ($500) or imprisonment not exceeding one (1) year, or both. It shall be the duty of the commissioner to dismiss from office or employment any officer or other employee of the department convicted for violating any of the provisions of KRS

439.500

.

History.

Enact. Acts 1956, ch. 101, §§ 33, 34, effective May 18, 1956; 1974, ch. 74, Art. V, § 24(14); 1982, ch. 344, § 59, effective July 15, 1982; 1992, ch. 211, § 107, effective July 14, 1992.